Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1808.01
Licensed nutritionist, defined.

Licensed nutritionist means a person who is licensed to practice medical nutrition therapy pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act and who holds a current license issued by the department pursuant to section 38-1817.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 32.